Mississippi, session 2026, SB2657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 49-7-181, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 49-7-181.  (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Wild turkey" means the game bird Meleagris gallopavo. (b)  "Stamp" means the state wild turkey stamp, either in its physical or electronic form, furnished by the commission.  A stamp is a specialized permit required for hunting wild turkeys, with proceeds directly dispersed into the conservation, management, protection or scientific research of wild turkeys. (c)  "Harvest tag" means the electronic tool used to serve as an inventory of the annual bag limit allotted to individual wild turkey hunters.  Harvest tags are invalidated upon the harvest of a wild turkey. (d)  "Nongovernmental entity" means a nonprofit organization primarily concerned with the protection and conservation of land and natural resources, as evidenced by its organizational documents. (2)  (a)  It shall be unlawful for any person not exempt under paragraph (b) of this subsection to hunt or take wild turkeys during any open wild turkey season in this state without first having procured a stamp.  The electronic stamp on file with the commission shall serve as proof of procurement. (b)  Any resident citizen of this state who has not reached the age of sixteen (16) years or who has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, or any resident citizen who is blind, paraplegic or a multiple amputee, or who has been adjudged by the Veterans Administration as having a total service-connected disability, or has been adjudged to be totally disabled by the Social Security Administration shall be exempt from the requirements of this section.  Further, the holder of any lifetime sportsman license authorized under Section 49-7-153 shall be exempt from the requirements of this section. (3)  The fee to resident hunters for each stamp shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00).  The fee to nonresident hunters for each stamp shall be One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).  Each stamp shall be valid through the final day of the spring wild turkey season following its purchase.  After its expiration, another stamp must be procured in order to hunt or take wild turkeys in a future open wild turkey season. (4)  Except for persons exempted under subsection (2)(b) of this section, the commission may make the procurement of harvest tags dependent upon the purchase of a stamp. (5)  The commission shall determine the form of the stamp.  The commission shall furnish physical stamps to bonded agents for issuance or sale in the same manner as other types of licenses or shall cause the electronic stamp to accrue to the purchaser's benefit when purchased from an automated point-of-sale source. (6)  Any person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) as prescribed in Section 49-7-101. (7)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Wild Turkey Stamp Fund."  All revenue collected from the proceeds of stamps shall be deposited into the * * * Fisheries and Wildlife fund created in * * * Section 49‑5‑21 this subsection (7) and shall be * * * used and expended designated for use by the department only for the following objectives: (a)  Paying administrative or processing costs associated with an electronic harvest tag program, or any other program governing or regulating the harvest of wild turkeys; (b)  Restoring, enhancing or protecting wild turkey populations or their habitats on public or private lands in Mississippi as prescribed by the department; (c)  Funding scientific research, as conducted by qualified professionals, into the ecology or management of wild turkeys, their habitats or their predators; and (d)  Increasing access to publicly available turkey hunting opportunities. (8)  Proceeds from stamps may be used as matching funds or fiscal leverage to secure grants or other financial awards which are deemed to align with the objectives in subsection (7) of this section.  No such proceeds shall be expended for administrative salaries. (9)  The commission may enter into agreements with other state, federal or nongovernmental entities to execute the objectives in subsection (7) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.